Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
REGULATION OF MANUFACTURE, DISTRIBUTION,

PRESCRIPTION,
AND DISPENSING OF CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES

§329-31 Rules. The department of
public safety may promulgate rules and charge reasonable fees relating to the
registration and control of the manufacture, distribution, prescription, and
dispensing of controlled substances within this State. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1;
am L 1990, c 281, §10]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next